Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 7. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 29.20.600.
Oaths of office.

Before taking office a municipal official shall affirm in writing that the duties of the office will be honestly, faithfully, and impartially performed by the official.
The oath is filed with the municipal clerk.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Collateral references. —

63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Officers and Employees, §§ 124, 125.

62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 358

67 C.J.S., Officers and Public Employees, § 59.

Sec. 29.20.610.
Bonding.

The manager and the other municipal officials or employees that the governing body may designate shall give bond in the amount and with the surety prescribed by the governing body. Premiums on bonds are paid by the municipality.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Collateral references. —

63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Officers and Employees, §§ 130 — 136.

62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 359

67 C.J.S., Officers and Public Employees, § 61.

Sec. 29.20.620.
Compensation for elected officials.

The governing body shall by ordinance provide a method of determining the salaries of elected officials.
The salary of the mayor may not be reduced during the term of office of the mayor, unless during the term a manager plan is adopted.
An elected official may not receive compensation for service to the municipality in addition to the salary received as an elected official, unless otherwise provided by ordinance.
Per diem payments or reimbursements for expenses are not compensation under this section.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Collateral references. —

56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 225 et seq.

62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 372 — 390.

Effect of illegality of appointment or compensation. 29 ALR4th 1452.

Sec. 29.20.630.
Prohibited discrimination.

A person may not be appointed to or removed from municipal office or in any way favored or discriminated against with respect to a municipal position or municipal employment because of the person’s race, color, sex, creed, national origin or, unless otherwise contrary to law, because of the person’s political opinions or affiliations.

Subject to AS

14.14.140

, a state employee or school district employee may not be denied the right to serve as an elected municipal official because of employment by the state or a school district. For purposes of this subsection, a school district employee is not a municipal employee.

This section applies to home rule and general law municipalities.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.20.640.
Reports.

A municipality shall file with the department

maps and descriptions of all annexed or detached territory;

a copy of the annual audit, or, for a second class city, an audit or statement of annual income and expenditures;

tax assessment and tax levy figures as requested;

a copy of the current annual budget of the municipality;

a summary of the optional property tax exemptions authorized together with the estimate of the revenues lost to the municipality by operation of each of the exemptions.

Compliance with the provisions of this section is a prerequisite to receipt of community assistance under AS

29.60.850

—

29.60.879

. If a municipality does not comply with this section, the department shall withhold the allocations until the required reports are filed.

This section applies to home rule and general law municipalities.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 2 ch 75 SLA 1997; am § 2 ch 12 SLA 2008; am § 1 ch 44 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (b), substituted “assistance” for “revenue sharing” following “receipt of community”.